Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

HB3619 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 34.11.5, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 34.11.5. A. There is hereby established the "Oklahoma
State Government Geographic Information One-Stop Initiative".
B. The State Geographic Information Coordinator shall develop
and maintain an online web presence at the web address
"maps.ok.gov". The site website shall allow public access to
geodata described in this section.
C. The State Geographic Information Coordinator shall
promulgate procedures by which each state agency, board, commission
and public trust having the State of Oklahoma as a beneficiary shall
submit geodata to the Office of Geographic Information to be
published on the "maps.ok.gov" its website created in subsection B
of this section or another State of Oklahoma-affiliated website.
D. For the purposes of this section, the term "geodata" shall
mean information which can be presented as a component of a
geographic or spatial presentation.
E. State agencies, boards, commissions and public trusts having
the State of Oklahoma as a beneficiary shall comply with procedures
promulgated pursuant to the terms of this section.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 82 O.S. 2021, Section 1501-205.1,
as amended by Section 1, Chapter 88, O.S.L. 2022 (82 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1501-205.1), is amended to read as follows:

HB3619 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Section 1501-205.1. A. As used in this section and in Sections
1501-205.2 and 1501-205.3 of this title:
1. "Geographic information" means any data or databases in
which location or spatial distribution is an essential element
including, but not limited to, land, air, water, and mineral
resources, the distribution of plant, animal, and human populations,
real property interests, zoning and other land development
regulations, and political, jurisdictional, ownership, and other
artificial divisions of geography;
2. "Geographic Information System" or "GIS" means computer
systems that allow the analysis of data or databases containing
geographic information; and
3. "Statewide data" means geographic information whose spatial
extent is defined by the geographic boundary of this state.
B. There is hereby created a State Geographic Information
Council composed of nineteen (19) twenty (20) members as follows:
1. Executive Director of the Oklahoma Conservation Commission
or designee;
2. Executive Director of the Department of Environmental
Quality or designee;
3. Chair of the Corporation Commission or designee;
4. Director of the Oklahoma Department Secretary of Commerce or
designee;

HB3619 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

5. Commissioner of the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture,
Food, and Forestry or designee;
6. Executive Director of the Oklahoma Water Resources Board or
designee;
7. Executive Director of the Department of Transportation or
designee;
8. State Geographer or designee Oklahoma 9-1-1 Coordinator from
the Oklahoma 9-1-1 Management Authority or designee;
9. Director of the Oklahoma Geological Survey or designee;
10. Director of the Center for Spatial Analysis of the
University of Oklahoma or designee;
11. Dean of the Division of Agricultural Sciences and Natural
Resources of Oklahoma State University or designee;
12. Director of the Ad Valorem Division of the Oklahoma Tax
Commission or designee;
13. A member appointed by the Executive Director of the
Oklahoma Conservation Commission from a list of names submitted to
the Director from the Oklahoma regional universities;
14. Director of State Chief Information Services Officer of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services or designee;
15. State Director of the Oklahoma Department of Wildlife
Conservation Director or designee;
16. Director of the Oklahoma Office of Homeland Security or
designee; and
HB3619 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

17. A representative of a statewide GIS professional
organization appointed by the Executive Director of the Oklahoma
Conservation Commission from a list of names submitted to the
Director from the State Geographic Information Council; and
18. Three members to be appointed by the Governor pursuant to
subsection C of this section.
C. The Governor shall appoint three members to the Council to
serve initial terms as specified by this subsection. Thereafter,
the terms of all appointed members shall be four (4) years.
Gubernatorial members shall not be appointed to more than three
successive terms. Members that are appointed by the Governor to
fill a vacancy may serve three successive terms. No appointment to
a partial term to fill a vacancy shall be counted for purposes of
determining term limits. Incumbent members may continue to serve on
the Council until a new appointment is made. The following members
shall be appointed by the Governor:
1. A representative of the Oklahoma Association of Regional
Councils, appointed for an initial four-year term;
2. A representative of county assessors, appointed for an
initial three-year term; and
3. A representative of city government, appointed for an
initial two-year term.


HB3619 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

D. The chair of the Council shall be the Executive Director of
the Oklahoma Conservation Commission or designee. Meetings shall be
called by the chair.
E. 1. A majority of the membership of the Council constitutes
a quorum for the conduct of business.
2. The Council shall meet at least twice each year, and the
chair may call a meeting of the Council as often as necessary to
transact business.
F. A member of the Council shall not:
1. Be an officer, employee, or paid consultant of a business
entity that has, or an officer, employee, or paid consultant of a
trade association for business entities that have, a substantial
interest in the geographic information industry and are doing
business with state agencies or other governmental units of the
state;
2. Own, control, or have, directly or indirectly, more than ten
percent (10%) interest in a business entity that has a substantial
interest in the geographic information industry and is doing
business with state agencies or other governmental units of the
state;
3. Be an officer, employee, or paid consultant of a business
entity that is connected with any contract or bid for furnishing to
any governmental body of the state with Geographic Information

HB3619 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Syst ems, the computers on which they are automated, or a service
related to Geographic Information Systems;
4. Be a person required to register as a lobbyist because of
activities for compensation on behalf of a business entity that has,
or on behalf of a trade association of business entities that have,
a substantial interest in the geographic information industry; or
5. Accept or receive money or another thing of value from an
individual, firm, or corporation to whom a contract may be awarded,
directly or indirectly, by rebate, gift or otherwise.
G. The duties of the Council shall include overseeing the
Office of Geographic Information concerning the following:
1. Development, adoption, and recommendation of standards and
procedures that may be applied to geographic information and
Geographic Information Systems to promote consistency of data
elements;
2. Development of a strategy for the implementation and funding
of a statewide Geographic Information System;
3. Development, delivery, and periodic revision of a statewide
geographic information plan and annually reporting to the Governor
and the Legislature. Such a plan shall include, but not be limited
to, provisions for training and education; and
4. Promotion of collaboration and sharing of data and data
development as well as other aspects of Geographic Information
Systems; and
HB3619 HFLR Page 7
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

5. Establishing a workgroup to develop standards that define
the process for mapping authoritative jurisdictional county
boundaries.
H. Neither the Council nor its members shall have the power to
form or award contracts or to employ staff. Members appointed by
the Governor shall serve without compensation.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 82 O.S. 2021, Section 1501-205.3,
is amended to read as follows:
Section 1501-205.3. A. There is hereby established an Office
of Geographic Information in the Oklahoma Conservation Commission.
B. The Executive Director of the Oklahoma Conservation
Commission shall appoint, after consultation with the State
Geographic Information Council, a person of suitable training,
experience, and knowledge to manage the Office with the title of
State Geographic Information Coordinator who shall serve at the
pleasure of the Executive Director.
C. The Office may solicit, receive and consider proposals for
funding from any state agency, federal agency, local government,
university, nonprofit organization, or private person or
corporation. The Office may also solicit and accept money by grant,
gift, bequest, or other conveyance recommended by the State
Geographic Information Council and approved by the Executive
Director of the Oklahoma Conservation Commission. Additionally, the
Office may receive a specific legislative appropriation within the
HB3619 HFLR Page 8
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

appr opriation for the Oklahoma Conservation Commission. Any funds
received by the Office shall be deposited into the Geographic
Information Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 1501-205.2 of Title
82 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.
D. The Office shall:
1. Provide staff support and technical assistance to the
Council established pursuant to Section 1501-205.1 of Title 82 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
2. Establish a central statewide geographic information
clearinghouse to maintain data inventories, information on current
and planned Geographic Information System applications, information
on grants available for the acquisition or enhancement of geographic
information resources, and a directory of geographic information
resources available within the state or from the federal government;
3. Coordinate any grant programs for local governments to
establish and maintain Geographic Information Systems as such
programs may be established by the Legislature;
4. Coordinate multiagency Geographic Information System
projects, including working with state and local agencies in the
development and maintenance of statewide data and Geographic
Information Systems, which includes:
a. conducting leaf-off aerial imagery biennially or
annually subject to the availability of funds, and

HB3619 HFLR Page 9
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

b. using the results from the leaf-off aerial imagery to
update the current authoritative jurisdictional county
boundary data layer using standards approved by the
State Geographic Information Council. The Office
shall present this updated data layer to the Council
annually for recertification of an authoritative
jurisdictional county boundary layer for use by the
state and its political subdivisions;
5. Provide access to both consulting and technical assistance,
and education and training on the application and use of geographic
information technologies to state and local agencies;
6. Develop, maintain, update, and interpret Geographic
Information System standards under the direction of the Council and
working with state and local agencies;
7. Provide Geographic Information System services, as
requested, to agencies wishing to augment their Geographic
Information System capabilities;
8. Evaluate, participate in pilot studies, and make
recommendations on Geographic Information System hardware and
software in cooperation with other agencies;
9. Prepare proposed legislation and funding proposals for the
Legislature that will further coordinate and expedite the
implementation of Geographic Information Systems as recommended by

HB3619 HFLR Page 10
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

the State Geographic Information Council and approved by the
Executive Director of the Oklahoma Conservation Commission;
10. Address data sensitivity issues so that information is made
available to the public but protects confidentiality of the
information; and
11. Provide an annual report to the Governor and Legislature on
the status and needs of the geographic information infrastructure of
the State of Oklahoma.
E. The Oklahoma House of Representatives and Oklahoma State
Senate may cooperate with the Office of Geographic Information but
shall be exempt from all requirements of this section.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT, dated
02/25/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended.










HB3619 HFLR Page 11
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.